lexicons/nom_rules.lexc
LEXICON Case-prefixes

@P.CASE.com@:@P.CASE.com@г%{Æ%}%> N-deriv-prefixes ;
@P.CASE.assoc@:@P.CASE.assoc@га%> N-deriv-prefixes ;
@P.CASE.prv@:@P.CASE.prv@%{Æ%}%> N-deriv-prefixes ;


LEXICON N-deriv-prefixes
%<f%>:ӈ%{Æ%}в%{ы%}%> NOMINALS ;
%<ints%>:ԓ%{ы%}ги%> NOMINALS ;
%<ints2%>:т%{Æ%}%> NOMINALS ;
%<restr%>:%{Æ%}м%> NOMINALS ;
%<approx%>:м%{Æ%}ԓ%> NOMINALS ;
%<approx%>:м%{Æ%}ч%> NOMINALS ;
%<auth%>:ԓ%{ы%}ги%> NOMINALS ;
: NOMINALS ;


LEXICON NOMINALS
: Nouns ;
: Pronouns ;


LEXICON CASES-ANIM

@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<ess%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}н K ;
! : CASES-ANIM-OBL ;
!
!
! LEXICON CASES-ANIM-OBL
@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<pl%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}нти K ;
@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<sg%>%<erg%>%<def%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%} K ;
@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<pl%>%<erg%>%<def%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}рык K ;
@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<def%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%} K ;
@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<pl%>%<loc%>%<def%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}рык K ;
@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<pl%>%<all%>%<def%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}рыкы%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} K ;
@D.CASE@%<aa%>%<all%>%<def%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}на K ;
%<aa%>:%>%{ы%}р CASES-OBL ;


LEXICON CASES-OBL                             !!

@D.CASE@%<pl%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}т%{и%} K ;
@D.CASE@%<erg%>:@D.CASE@%>%{T%}%{Æ%} K ;
@D.CASE@%<ess%>:@D.CASE@%>у K ;
@D.CASE@%<loc%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}к K ;
@D.CASE@%<all%>:@D.CASE@%>%{G%}ты%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} K ;
@D.CASE@%<abl%>:@D.CASE@%>%{G%}%{ы%}пы%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} K ;
@D.CASE@%<ori%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}гйит K ;
@D.CASE@%<ine%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}чыку K ;
@D.CASE@%<per%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}еквэ%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} K ;
@D.CASE@%<sub%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}йиӈкы K ;
@D.CASE@:@D.CASE@ POSS ;
@D.CASE@:@D.CASE@ REL ;

! circumfixes
@R.CASE.com@%<com%>:@R.CASE.com@%>%{T%}%{Æ%} K ;
@R.CASE.assoc@%<assoc%>:@R.CASE.assoc@%>%{ы%}ма%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} K ;
@R.CASE.prv@%<prv%>:@R.CASE.prv@%>%{ы%}к%{Æ%} K ;




LEXICON N-Ia-AATGYR                                   ! bare stem

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;
%<n%>: N-OBL ;


! LEXICON N-Ia-JYNYR                                ! bare stem with n/ng alteration
!
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;
! %<n%>: N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-Ib-ANGKY                                   ! stem-final vowel reduction

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%{°%} K ;
%<n%>: N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-Ic-AJKOL                                   ! stem-final vowel deletion

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%{·%} K ;
%<n%>: N-OBL ;


! LEXICON N-Ic-EJNETKUNEN                          ! vowel deletion with n/ng alteration
!
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%{·%} K ;
! %<n%>: N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-II-VIIL-ABS ! a-VIIL-ABS                               ! full reduplication

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;


! LEXICON N-IIb-VAJP-ABS                               ! partial reduplication
!
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;


LEXICON N-III-AVYNRAL                                   ! n absolutive

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>%{ы%}н K ;
%<n%>: N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-IV-ARAPA                                   ! ngy absolutive

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>%{ы%}ӈы K ;
%<n%>: N-OBL ;


! LEXICON N-IV-QORA                                ! qora-qaa
!
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>%{ы%}ӈы K ;
! %<n%>: N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-Vv-AVEEN                                   ! irregular; в-oblique

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;
%<n%>:в N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-Vvy-AGNOTVAN                               ! irregular; в-oblique; ы-abs

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ы K ;
%<n%>:в N-OBL ;


LEXICON N-SING-AJOPYCH                               ! lg singulative

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sing%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>%{ы%}ԓгын%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} K ;
@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>:@U.itsa.noun@ CASES-OBL ;
%<n%>: N-DERIV-SUFF ;


LEXICON N-SING-EPEEPEG                               ! lyng singulative

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sing%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>%{ы%}ԓыӈын%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} K ;
@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>:@U.itsa.noun@ CASES-OBL ;
%<n%>: N-DERIV-SUFF ;


LEXICON N-VANGQASQOR-ABS

@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;


LEXICON N-OBL
@U.itsa.noun@:@U.itsa.noun@ CASES-OBL ;
@U.itsa.noun@:@U.itsa.noun@ CASES-ANIM ;
! : N-DERIV-PREF ;
!
!
!
! LEXICON N-DERIV-PREF
! %<f%>%[%+f%]: N-DERIV-SUFF ;
! %<ints%>%[%+ints%]: N-DERIV-SUFF ;
! %<ints2%>%[%+ints2%]: N-DERIV-SUFF ;
! %<approx%>%[%+approx%]: N-DERIV-SUFF ;
! %<restr%>%[%+restr%]: N-DERIV-SUFF ;
! %<auth%>%[%+auth%]: N-DERIV-SUFF ;
: N-DERIV-SUFF ;


LEXICON N-DERIV-SUFF

%<rel_n%>:%>%{ы%}ԓь N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
%<nmzr%>:%>%{ы%}ԓӄыԓ N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
%<nmzr%>:%>%{ы%}чь N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
%<nmzr%>:%>%{ы%}ёԓг N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
%<pers_n%>:%>%{ы%}ӈ%{Æ%}выт N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
%<pers_n%>:%>%{ы%}ӈ%{Æ%}в N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
%<pers_n%>:%>%{ы%}вйи N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
%<dim%>:%>%{ы%}ӄ%{Æ%}й N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
%<aug%>:%>%{ы%}ч%{ы%}%{N%} N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
%<aug%>:%>%{ы%}йӈ N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
%<coop%>:%>%{ы%}мк N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
%<coop%>:%>%{ы%}тку N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
%<coop%>:%>%{ы%}гинив N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
%<prtt%>:%>%{ы%}тъуԓ N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
%<ger%>:%>%{ы%}гырг%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;
: N-DERIV-SUFF-T ;



LEXICON N-DERIV-SUFF-T

! : N-DERIV-PREF ;
%<rel_n%>:%>%{ы%}ԓь N-DERIV-III ;
%<nmzr%>:%>%{ы%}ԓӄыԓ N-DERIV-I ;
%<nmzr%>:%>%{ы%}чь N-DERIV-III ;
%<nmzr%>:%>%{ы%}ёԓг N-DERIV-III ;
%<pers_n%>:%>%{ы%}ӈ%{Æ%}выт N-DERIV-I ;
%<pers_n%>:%>%{ы%}ӈ%{Æ%}в N-DERIV-I ;
%<pers_n%>:%>%{ы%}вйи N-DERIV-I ;
%<dim%>:%>%{ы%}ӄ%{Æ%}й N-DERIV-I ;
%<aug%>:%>%{ы%}ч%{ы%}%{N%} N-DERIV-III ;
%<aug%>:%>%{ы%}йӈ N-DERIV-III ;
%<coop%>:%>%{ы%}мк N-DERIV-I ;
%<coop%>:%>%{ы%}тку N-DERIV-III ;
%<coop%>:%>%{ы%}гинив N-DERIV-I ;
%<prtt%>:%>%{ы%}тъуԓ N-DERIV-I ;
%<ger%>:%>%{ы%}гырг%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} N-DERIV-III ;
! cross to verbs
@D.CASE@@R.itsa.verb@%<v%>%<iv%>:@D.CASE@@R.itsa.verb@%>%{Æ%}т V-IV ;
@D.CASE@@R.itsa.verb@%<v%>%<iv%>:@D.CASE@@R.itsa.verb@%>%{Æ%}в V-IV ;
! compounds
! @D.complex@@P.complex.cmp@%<cmp%>%+:@D.complex@@P.complex.cmp@%>%{ы%} Nouns ;
! Incorporation
! %<incorp%>%+:%>%{ы%} Verbs ;
@D.CASE@@R.itsa.verb@%<incorp%>%+:@D.CASE@@R.itsa.verb@%>%{ы%} Verbs ;
! cross to adj
@D.CASE@@R.itsa.adj@:@D.CASE@@R.itsa.adj@ ADJ ;
! адвербные деривации
@D.CASE@%<adv_prol%>:@D.CASE@%>этэ ADV ;
! : N-DERIV-SPACIAL ;
!
!
! LEXICON N-DERIV-SPACIAL
%<top%>:%>%{ы%}ткын%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} N-DERIV-I ;
%<near%>:%>%{ы%}ӈӄача N-DERIV-Ic ;
%<near%>:%>%{ы%}ӈӄаса N-DERIV-Ic ;
%<edge%>:%>%{ы%}ԓг N-DERIV-III ;
%<edge%>:%>%{ы%}ԓэӈ N-DERIV-III ;
%<side%>:%>%{ы%}чурм N-DERIV-III ;
%<side%>:%>%{ы%}cурм N-DERIV-III ;
%<bottom%>:%>%{ы%}йиӈ N-DERIV-III ;
%<bottom%>:%>%{ы%}гиӈ N-DERIV-III ;
%<ext%>:%>%{ы%}йикви N-DERIV-III ;
%<among%>:%>%{ы%}ԓыку N-DERIV-III ;
%<in%>:%>%{ы%}сыку N-DERIV-III ;
%<surf%>:%>%{ы%}сӄ N-DERIV-III ;
%<front%>:%>%{ы%}тэгн N-DERIV-III ;





LEXICON POSS
! different possessed, mark on the possessor
%<poss%>%<1sg%>:%>ин%{Æ%}гым N-DERIV-I ;
%<poss%>%<2sg%>:%>ин%{Æ%}гыт N-DERIV-I ;
%<poss%>%<3sg%>:%>ин%{Æ%} N-DERIV-Ic ;
%<poss%>%<1pl%>:%>ин%{Æ%}мури N-DERIV-I ;
%<poss%>%<2pl%>:%>ин%{Æ%}тури N-DERIV-I ;
%<poss%>%<3pl%>:%>ин%{Æ%}т%{и%} N-DERIV-I ;
%<pl%>%<poss%>%<1sg%>:%>%{ы%}ргин%{Æ%}гым N-DERIV-I ;
%<pl%>%<poss%>%<2sg%>:%>%{ы%}ргин%{Æ%}гыт N-DERIV-I ;
%<pl%>%<poss%>%<3sg%>:%>%{ы%}ргин N-DERIV-I ;
%<pl%>%<poss%>%<1pl%>:%>%{ы%}ргин%{Æ%}мури N-DERIV-I ;
%<pl%>%<poss%>%<2pl%>:%>%{ы%}ргин%{Æ%}тури N-DERIV-I ;
%<pl%>%<poss%>%<3pl%>:%>%{ы%}ргин%{Æ%}т%{и%} N-DERIV-I ;

! different possessors, mark on the possessed
%<px1sg%>%<abs%>:%>%{ы%}гым K ;
%<px2sg%>%<abs%>:%>%{ы%}гыт K ;
%<px3sg%>%<abs%>:%>%{ы%}н K ;
%<px1pl%>%<abs%>:%>%{ы%}мури K ;
%<px2pl%>%<abs%>:%>%{ы%}тури K ;
%<px3pl%>%<abs%>:%>%{ы%}т%{и%} K ;

LEXICON REL
%<rel%>:%>%{ы%}кин N-DERIV-I ;

LEXICON PERS-NUM-CLITICS
%<1sg%>:%>%{I%}гым K ;
%<2sg%>:%>%{I%}гыт K ;
%<3sg%>:%>%{ы%}ӄин K ;
%<3sg%>:%>%{ы%}кин K ;
%<1pl%>:%>%{ы%}мури K ;
%<2pl%>:%>%{ы%}тури K ;
%<3pl%>:%>%{ы%}ӄин%{Æ%}т K ;
%<3pl%>:%>%{ы%}кин%{Æ%}т K ;


!!! FIXME

LEXICON N-DERIV-I
@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;
: N-OBL ;

LEXICON N-DERIV-Ic
@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%{·%} K ;
: N-OBL ;

LEXICON N-DERIV-III
@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>%{ы%}н K ;
: N-OBL ;

! LEXICON INTO-N-I
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;
! : N-OBL ;
!
! LEXICON INTO-N-III
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>%{ы%}н K ;
! : N-OBL ;

LEXICON INTO-N-NEG-PART
@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%>ин K ;
@U.itsa.noun@:@U.itsa.noun@%>ин%{Æ%} N-OBL ;
!
! LEXICON INTO-N-Vv                                   ! irregular; в-oblique
!
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@ K ;
! @U.itsa.noun@:@U.itsa.noun@в N-OBL ;
!
! LEXICON INTO-N-Ic
!
! @D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@@U.itsa.noun@%{·%} K ;
! : N-OBL ;

LEXICON K
: # ;
%<part%>:%>э # ;
%<part%>:%>%{ы%}ӈэ # ;
%<emph%>:%>ъым # ;    !!! FIXME
%<clitic%>:%>%{ы%}рээн # ;
